Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.420

Copy of this chapter, rules and regulations available to licensee.

On or about the first day of February in each year, the director shall cause to be made available at reasonable expense to a licensee a copy of this chapter, a copy of the current rules and regulations of the director, and board, and such other materials as the director or board prescribe.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 33.]